test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaadhnekj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kaađneǩ e-stem savuastia: # Noun - full paradigm
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kaađneǩ
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩ
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩ
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kaađnekka
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩest
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩin
     kaađneǩ+N+Ess+Indef: kaađneʹǩǩen
     kaađneǩ+N+Par+Indef: kaađneʹǩǩed
     kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kaađneeʹǩǩtaa, kaađneeʹǩǩtää]
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩ
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩi
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩid
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩid
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩin
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kaađneeʹǩǩivuiʹm
     kaađneǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kaađneeʹǩǩitaa, kaađneeʹǩǩitää]
